Louisiana, session 2026, HB1087.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 8:415.1 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§415.1. City of Zachary; use of labor by prisoners
A. For the purpose of abating any public health or safety risks, the city of
Zachary may, after consultation with the division, use prison labor to clean and
maintain abandoned cemeteries.
B. The use of labor by a prisoner sentenced to a parish prison of any parish
of the state, by any court of competent jurisdiction, or a prisoner in a parish prison
awaiting transfer to a state correctional facility, to clean and maintain abandoned
cemeteries for the city of Zachary, shall be subject to the provisions of R.S. 15:708.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-800 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1087
C. Notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the contrary, the city of
Zachary may use funds appropriated by the legislature to maintain a cemetery to pay
for prison labor from Dixon Correctional Institute.